Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB916.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3502(d.1) and (e) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and subsection (c)(2) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 3502. Burglary.* * *(c) Grading.--* * *(2) As follows:* * *(iii) If the actor's intent upon entering the building, structure or portion under subparagraph (i) is to commit theft of a firearm or ammunition for a firearm, 12345678910111213141516171819 burglary is a felony of the first degree.* * *(d.1) Sentencing [enhancement] enhancements.--The Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentencing enhancement for courts to consider in cases involving burglary where:(1) a domestic animal is harmed or killed in the course of the burglary[.]; or(2) a subsequent crime is committed using a firearm or ammunition stolen during the burglary.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:"Bodily injury crime." As follows:(1) An act, attempt or threat to commit an act which would constitute a misdemeanor or felony under the following:Chapter 25 (relating to criminal homicide).Chapter 27 (relating to assault).Chapter 29 (relating to kidnapping).Chapter 31 (relating to sexual offenses).Section 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses).Chapter 37 (relating to robbery).Chapter 49 Subch. B (relating to victim and witness intimidation).(2) The term includes violations of any protective order issued as a result of an act related to domestic violence."Firearm." As defined in section 6105(i) (relating to persons not to possess, use, manufacture, control, sell or 20250SB0916PN1092 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transfer firearms).Section 2. The definitions of "child" and "delinquent act" in section 6302 of Title 42 are amended to read:§ 6302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Child." An individual who:(1) is under the age of 18 years;(2) is under the age of 21 years who committed an act of delinquency before reaching the age of 18 years; or(3) is under the age of 21 years and was adjudicated dependent before reaching the age of 18 years, who has requested the court to retain jurisdiction and who remains under the jurisdiction of the court as a dependent child because the court has determined that the child is:(i) completing secondary education or an equivalent credential;(ii) enrolled in an institution which provides postsecondary or [vocational] career or technical education;(iii) participating in a program actively designed to promote or remove barriers to employment;(iv) employed for at least 80 hours per month; or(v) incapable of doing any of the activities described in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv) due to a medical or behavioral health condition, which is supported by regularly updated information in the permanency plan of the child.20250SB0916PN1092 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Delinquent act."(1) The term means an act designated a crime under the law of this Commonwealth, or of another state if the act occurred in that state, or under Federal law, or an act which constitutes indirect criminal contempt under Chapter 62A (relating to protection of victims of sexual violence or intimidation) with respect to sexual violence or 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to protection from abuse) or the failure of a child to comply with a lawful sentence imposed for a summary offense, in which event notice of the fact shall be certified to the court.(2) The term shall not include:(i) The crime of murder.(ii) Any of the following prohibited conduct where the child was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and a deadly weapon as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2301 (relating to definitions) was used during the commission of the offense which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as:(A) Rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121 (relating to rape).(B) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(C) Aggravated assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702(a)(1) or (2) (relating to aggravated assault).(C.1) Burglary as defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3502(a)(3) (relating to burglary).(D) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)20250SB0916PN1092 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1)(i), (ii) or (iii) (relating to robbery).(E) Robbery of motor vehicle as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3702 (relating to robbery of motor vehicle).(F) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).(G) Kidnapping as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901 (relating to kidnapping).(H) Voluntary manslaughter.(I) An attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit murder or any of these crimes as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 901 (relating to criminal attempt), 902 (relating to criminal solicitation) and 903 (relating to criminal conspiracy).(iii) Any of the following prohibited conduct where the child was 15 years of age or older at the time of the alleged conduct and has been previously adjudicated delinquent of any of the following prohibited conduct which, if committed by an adult, would be classified as:(A) Rape as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3121.(B) Involuntary deviate sexual intercourse as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3123.(C) Robbery as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3701(a)(1)(i), (ii) or (iii).(D) Robbery of motor vehicle as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3702.(E) Aggravated indecent assault as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3125.(F) Kidnapping as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2901.20250SB0916PN1092 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (G) Voluntary manslaughter.(H) An attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit murder or any of these crimes as provided in 18 Pa.C.S. §§ 901, 902 and 903.(iv) Summary offenses.(v) A crime committed by a child who has been found guilty in a criminal proceeding for other than a summary offense.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0916PN1092 - 6 - 12345678910